Massachusetts, session 194th, S2509.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding section 59A of chapter 43 of the General Laws, or any
general or special law to the contrary, if a vacancy occurs in the office of mayor before the last
12 months of the term of office, the city clerk shall forthwith order an election to fill such
vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired term.
If a vacancy occurs in the office of the mayor during the last 12 months of the term of
office, the city council shall forthwith hold a meeting and elect by majority vote one of its
members as mayor for the remainder of the unexpired term. If the city council fails to so elect at
said meeting or within 30 days thereafter, the president of the city council shall become acting
mayor, shall exercise all the rights and powers of mayor and shall be sworn to the faithful
discharge of the mayor’s duties.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1